Arkansas, session 2025, HB1193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 89, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-89-218. Lienholder included on payment of insurance proceeds.
(a) If an insured or third-party claimant makes a demand or files a
claim for damages to a motor vehicle, either with an insurer or in a court of
law, and there is a perfected lienholder for an automobile loan on the motor
vehicle, the motor vehicle liability insurer shall tender payment in the name
of the insured or third-party claimant and the lienholder.
(b) This section does not apply to a lienholder that:
(1) Does not have a physical location in the state; or
(2) Has a physical location in the state, but:
(A) The claim for damages to a motor vehicle is less than
two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500); or
(B) The payment is made directly to a repair facility for
the amount of the repairs.

*ANS043*
03-10-2025 14:04:30 ANS043

As Engrossed: H1/27/25 H1/30/25 S3/10/25 HB1193
/s/Cavenaugh



































03-10-2025 14:04:30 ANS043